Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4110
Development of preferred provider organizations; conditions.

All providers of health services in Nebraska may develop preferred provider organizations and contract with insurers and participants in insurance arrangements if such providers have met all licensure and certification requirements necessary to practice a specific profession or to operate a specific health care facility pursuant to the Health Care Facility Licensure Act and the Uniform Credentialing Act. An organization of preferred providers may limit itself to one or more specific professions or specialties within a profession, as defined in the Uniform Credentialing Act, and may limit the number of participating providers to that required to adequately meet the need for its particular program and the purpose of sections 44-4101 to 44-4113 to furnish health services in a manner reasonably expected to contain or lower costs.

Laws 1984, LB 902, § 10;

Laws 1995, LB 473, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1139.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.